Alaska, session 34, HB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 43.55.890 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 43.55.890. Disclosure of tax information. Notwithstanding any contrary 05 provision of AS 40.25.100, and regardless of whether the information is considered 06 under AS 43.05.230(e) to constitute statistics classified to prevent the identification of 07 particular returns or reports, the department 08 (1) may publish the following information under this chapter, if 09 aggregated among three or more producers or explorers, showing by month or 10 calendar year and by lease or property, unit, or area of the state: 11 (A) [(1)] the amount of oil or gas production; 12 (B) [(2)] the amount of taxes levied under this chapter or paid 13 under this chapter; 14 (C) [(3)] the effective tax rates under this chapter; 15 (D) [(4)] the gross value of oil or gas at the point of production; 01 (E) [(5)] the transportation costs for oil or gas; 02 (F) [(6)] qualified capital expenditures, as defined in 03 AS 43.55.023; 04 (G) [(7)] exploration expenditures under AS 43.55.025; 05 (H) [(8)] production tax values of oil or gas under 06 AS 43.55.160; 07 (I) [(9)] lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165; 08 (J) [(10)] adjustments to lease expenditures under 09 AS 43.55.170; 10 (K) [(11)] tax credits applicable or potentially applicable 11 against taxes levied by this chapter; 12 (2) shall, within 30 days after a request, make public the following 13 information under this chapter, by unit and by month: 14 (A) the total amount of oil and gas produced by each 15 working interest owner in the unit; 16 (B) the estimated gross value at the point of production of 17 oil and gas produced by each working interest owner in the unit; 18 (C) the estimated transportation costs attributable to oil 19 and gas produced by each working interest owner in the unit; 20 (D) the estimated production tax value of oil and gas 21 produced by each working interest owner in the unit; 22 (E) the estimated tax due under this chapter on oil and gas 23 produced by each working interest owner in the unit, as calculated under 24 AS 43.55.020; 25 (F) the amount of state royalty assessed on oil and gas 26 produced by each working interest owner in the unit. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.